Massachusetts, session 194th, S496.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 115 of chapter 112 of the general laws as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition is hereby amended by inserting after subsection (e) the following new
subsection:-
(f) Any person licensed as a nursing home administrator, or acting in the capacity of a
nursing home administrator shall certify under the pains and penalties of perjury at the
commencement of the fiscal year of the facility for which they are the administrator that the
facility’s budget and staffing are sufficient to meet the regular and customary operational needs
of the facility including, but not limited to meeting the care needs of all residents then residing in
such facility. Said certification shall be counter-signed by the designated medical director for
such facility in accordance with Center for Medicare and Medicaid Operations Manual 100.07,
section 483 (i).
of 3

For purposes of this act, “care needs,” shall mean the sum total of the programs, services,
staffing, dietary, recreational, rehabilitative, and medical equipment identified in the care plans
of each resident including, but not limited to the apportioned cost of all aspects of housing and
management for said residents.
SECTION 2. Said subsection 115, is hereby further amended by adding the following
new subsection:-
(g) Whenever a nursing home administrator licensed pursuant to the laws and regulations
of the Commonwealth and its agencies, fails to assent to the sufficiency of the facility budget,
said licensee shall be suspended by the board of registration of nursing home administrators
subject to such further disciplinary action as circumstances may require.
It shall not be an acceptable reason for failure to sign an affidavit of sufficiency of the
budget of the facility for the nursing home administrator, or person acting in such capacity, to
claim that corporate management of the facility had approved the budget without regard to the
certification of sufficiency by the facility administrator. If, in the absence of an affidavit of
sufficiency signed by the administrator and counter-signed by the medical director, the facility
shall be prohibited from accepting any new residents until such affidavit is submitted to the
satisfaction of the department of public health.
SECTION 3. Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 72BB the following new section:-
Section 72CC. If, upon determination by the department of public health, it appears that
the budget of any facility licensed pursuant to the provisions of chapter 111 of the general laws
as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is insufficient to meet the care needs of the residents,
of 3

said department shall, after public hearing, may apply sanctions upon the facility up to, and
including, revocation of the facility license or receivership. The department of public health is
hereby authorized and directed to promulgate regulations to implement this provision.
SECTION 4. Said chapter 111, is hereby further amended, by inserting after section
72CC the following new section:-
Section 72DD. Any adverse event or events that are found by said department to have
adversely affected the health, safety or lives of residents, as the direct or indirect result of
operating a facility with an insufficient budget, shall be considered the responsibility of the
nursing home administrator and/or the medical director if there is a signed affidavit of budget
sufficiency, or in the case of operation without a signed affidavit of sufficiency, to owners of the
facility of record, may be held criminal and civil liable for such adverse event or events.
SECTION 5. The department of public health shall develop appropriate regulations to
implement the provisions of this act not later than July 1, 2027.
of 3